Oklahoma, session 2026, SB500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1289.31 of Title 21, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Ammunition” means a loaded cartridge or shot shell, case,
primer, projectile, wadding, or propellant powder;
2. “Company” means a for-profit organization, association,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership,

limited liability partnership, or limited liability company,
including a wholly owned subsidiary, majority-owned subsidiary,
parent company, or an affiliate of those entities or associations
that exists to make a profit. The term does not include a sole
proprietorship;
3. “Discriminate against a firearm entity or firearm trade
association” means, with respect to the entity or association, to:
a. refuse to engage in the trade of any goods or services
with the entity or association based solely on its
status as a firearm entity or firearm trade
association which includes the lawful products and
services provided by and lawful practices of firearm
entities and firearm trade associations,
b. refrain from continuing an existing business
relationship with the entity or association based
solely on its status as a firearm entity or firearm
trade association which includes the lawful products
and services provided by and lawful practices of
firearm entities and firearm trade associations, or
c. terminate an existing business relationship with the
entity or association based solely on its status as a
firearm entity or firearm trade association which
includes the lawful products and services provided by
and lawful practices of firearm entities and firearm
trade associations.
The term does not include the policies of a vendor, merchant, retail
seller, or platform that restrict or prohibit the listing or selling
of ammunition, firearms, or firearm accessories. The term also does
not include a company’s refusal to engage in the trade of any goods
or services, decision to refrain from continuing an existing
business relationship, or decision to terminate an existing business
relationship to comply with federal, state, or local laws, policies,
or regulations or a directive by a regulatory agency, or for any
traditional business reason that is specific to the customer or
potential customer and not based solely on the status of an entity
or association as a firearm entity or firearm trade association
ENR. S. B. NO. 500 Page 2

which includes the lawful products and services provided by and
lawful practices of firearm entities and firearm trade associations;
4. “Firearm” means a weapon that expels a projectile by the
action of explosive or expanding gases;
5. “Firearm accessory” means a device specifically designed or
adapted to enable an individual to wear, carry, store, or mount a
firearm on the individual or on a conveyance and an item used in
conjunction with or mounted on a firearm that is not essential to
the basic function of the firearm. The term includes a detachable
firearm magazine;
6. “Firearm entity” means:
a. a firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition
manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, supplier, or
retailer, and
b. a gun range;
7. “Firearm trade association” means any person, corporation,
unincorporated association, federation, business league, or business
organization that:
a. is not organized or operated for profit and for which
none of its net earning inures to the benefit of any
private shareholder or individual,
b. has two or more firearm entities as members, and
c. is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(a), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, as
an organization described by Section 501(c) of that
code;
8. “Governmental entity” means any branch, department, agency,
or instrumentality of state government, or any official or other
person acting under color of state law, or any political subdivision
of this state;
ENR. S. B. NO. 500 Page 3

9. “Sole-source provider” means a supplier who provides goods
or services of a unique nature or goods or services that are solely
available through the supplier and the supplier is the only
practicable source to provide such goods or services; and
10. “Contract” means a promise or set of promises constituting
an agreement between the parties that gives each a legal duty to the
other and the right to seek a remedy for the breach of those duties
but does not include an agreement related to investment services.
B. A governmental entity may not enter into a contract with a
company for the purchase of goods or services unless the contract
contains a written verification from the company that it:
1. Does not have a practice, policy, guidance, or directive
that discriminates against a firearm entity or firearm trade
association; and
2. Will not discriminate against a firearm entity or firearm
trade association during the term of the contract.
C. The provisions of subsection B of this section shall not
apply to a governmental entity that:
1. Contracts with a sole-source provider; or
2. Does not receive a bid from a company that is able to
provide the written verification required by subsection B of this
section.
D. The provisions of this section shall apply only to a
contract that:
1. Is between a governmental entity and a company with at least
ten full-time employees; and
2. Has a value of at least One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00) that is paid wholly or partly from public funds of the
governmental entity.
E. The Purchasing Division of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services shall have the authority and responsibility of
ENR. S. B. NO. 500 Page 4

reviewing state governmental contracts to confirm that the
requirements of subsection B of this section have been satisfied.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 500 Page 5

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 500 Page 6